Rhode Island, session 2025, HB5608.
It is enacted by the General Assembly as follows:
SECTION 1. Section 20-7-15 of the General Laws in Chapter 20-7 entitled "Lobsters and
Other Crustaceans" is hereby amended to read as follows:
20-7-15. Taking of blue crabs.
Unless otherwise specified by regulation, no person shall take, or attempt to take, any blue
crabs from any of the waters in this state except by a scoop or crab net, trot, or hand line. Taking
of blue crabs shall be restricted to residents of this state.
There shall be no limit, rules or regulations, restricting the harvesting of blue crabs in the
state.
SECTION 2. This act shall take effect upon passage.
========
LC001734
========